Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-527
State Fire Marshal; schools; exits; fire drills.

It shall be the duty of the State Fire Marshal and his or her deputies and assistants to require teachers of public and private schools and educational institutions to conduct regular fire drills in accordance with such rules and regulations as he or she may adopt and promulgate and to keep all doors and exits unlocked during school hours.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 26, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 81-5526;

R.S.1943, § 81-527;

Laws 1988, LB 893, § 16.

For instruction on fire prevention in schools, see section 79-706.